Hawaii statutes.
§471-8 Examinations; qualifications of
applicants. (a) No person shall be licensed to practice veterinary
medicine unless the person has passed an examination of the qualifications and
fitness to engage in the practice of veterinary medicine given by the board of
veterinary examiners. Before any applicant shall be eligible for examination
under this chapter the applicant, at least sixty days before the date set for
examination, shall file an application in the form as shall be prescribed by
the board, pay to the department of commerce and consumer affairs application
and examination fees, and furnish proof satisfactory to the board that the
applicant:

(1) Is eighteen or more years of age; and

(2) Is a graduate of a veterinary college meeting all
the standards established by the American Veterinary Medical Association, or,
in lieu thereof, has actively practiced for ten out of twelve years immediately
preceding the date of application in a state having standards for licensing
comparable to those in this State.

(b) Examinations shall be given by the board
twice each year except when there are no applications pending. They shall be
composed of written questions, a part of which shall consist of those aspects
of veterinary medicine common to the State on toxic substances, parasite
diseases, unique soil conditions, and quarantine standards. The same questions
shall be given to each person being examined during a particular examination.
The subject matter of the examinations shall embrace the subjects and
demonstrations of practical ability normally covered in the curricula of
American veterinary colleges. The form of the examination shall be determined
by the board. Applicants shall certify on the application that they have read,
understood, and agree to comply with the laws and rules that the board
determines are required for licensure.

The requirements imposed by this section shall
not be a bar to renewal, reissuance, or restoration of any license issued prior
to May 13, 1949. [L 1949, c 280, pt of §1; RL 1955, §73-8; am L 1961, c 142,
§9(a); HRS §471-8; am L 1972, c 2, §29; am L 1973, c 157, §1; am L 1978, c 22,
§1; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1984, c 7, §76 and c 44, §4; am L 1998, c 184,
§1]

Cross References

Disposal of examination records, see §94-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next